Utah statutes.
4-9-4.   Weights and measures -- Primary state standards -- Secondary state standards -- Verification.

(1)  Weights and measures that are traceable to the United States prototype standards supplied by the federal government, or approved as being satisfactory by the National Institute of Standards and Technology, shall be the state primary standards, and shall be maintained in the calibration prescribed by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(2)  Secondary standards may be prescribed by the department and shall be verified upon their initial receipt, and as often after initial receipt as is considered necessary by the department.



Amended by Chapter 358, 2004 General Session

